Maryland, session 2026, HB0115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 428 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) “Department” means the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services.
(q) (1) “State correctional facility” means a correctional facility that is
operated by the State.
(2) “State correctional facility” includes:
(i) the Patuxent Institution;
(ii) the Baltimore City Detention Center; and
(iii) the centralized booking facility in Baltimore City that is operated
by the Division of Pretrial Detention and Services in the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.
2–601.
The Department shall:
(1) provide each individual who is released from a correctional facility with
a voter registration application and documentation with the individual’s discharge papers
that informs the individual that the individual’s voting rights have been restored;
(2) display a sign in each parole and probation office, in a conspicuous
location where notices to the public are customarily posted, indicating that any individual
who is no longer incarcerated has the right to vote; and
(3) post a notice, in a conspicuous location on the Department’s website,
indicating that any individual who is no longer incarcerated has the right to vote.
Article – Election Law
3–203.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 1–101 OF THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE STATE BOARD AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES JOINTLY SHALL
DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT PROCEDURES AND AN ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION
PROCESS THAT COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION FOR THE RESTORATION OF VOTER
REGISTRATION FOR INDIVIDUALS RELEASED FROM INCARCERATION AT A STATE
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 428
(B) (C) ON A WEEKLY MONTHLY BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES SHALL ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT TO
THE STATE BOARD A LIST THAT INCLUDES THE NAME AND NEW RESIDENTIAL
ADDRESS OF FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS RELEASED
FROM INCARCERATION AT A STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY IN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING WEEK MONTH:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL’S FULL NAME;
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL’S DATE OF BIRTH;
(3) THE LAST FOUR DIGITS OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER, DRIVER’S LICENSE NUMBER, OR STATE–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION CARD
NUMBER;
(4) THE DATE THE INDIVIDUAL WAS RELEASED FROM
INCARCERATION; AND
(5) THE INDIVIDUAL’S NEW RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS.
(C) (D) ON RECEIPT OF THE LIST UNDER SUBSECTION (B) (C) OF THIS
SECTION, THE STATE BOARD SHALL IDENTIFY EACH INDIVIDUAL ON THE LIST WHO
WAS REGISTERED TO VOTE IN THE STATE BEFORE BEING INCARCERATED AND
WHOSE NEW RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS IS LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(D) (E) THE STATE BOARD SHALL AUTOMATICALLY PROMPTLY RESTORE
THE VOTER REGISTRATION OF EACH INDIVIDUAL IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) (D) OF THIS SECTION AT THE INDIVIDUAL’S NEW RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS AND
GIVE THE INDIVIDUAL ACTIVE VOTER STATUS.
(E) (F) WITH THE VOTER NOTIFICATION CARD THAT IS SENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–301(C) OF THIS TITLE TO EACH INDIVIDUAL WHOSE VOTER
REGISTRATION IS RESTORED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
ELECTION DIRECTOR SHALL ENCLOSE A NOTICE THAT INCLUDES A STATEMENT
THAT:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN REGISTERED TO VOTE AT THE
RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS THE INDIVIDUAL PROVIDED TO A STATE AGENCY;
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE TO VOTE IN THE STATE IN ALL
FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL ELECTIONS; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 428 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) IF THE INDIVIDUAL WISHES TO DECLINE VOTER REGISTRATION,
OR IF THE INDIVIDUAL NEEDS TO UPDATE THE INDIVIDUAL’S RESIDENTIAL
ADDRESS, THE INDIVIDUAL SHOULD CONTACT THE STATE BOARD OR THE
APPROPRIATE LOCAL BOARD.
(F) (G) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, THE FACT
THAT A PARTICULAR VOTER WAS REGISTERED THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES UNDER THIS SECTION § 3–506 OF
THIS TITLE AND THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, THE IDENTITY OF THE VOTER
REGISTRATION AGENCY THROUGH WHICH A FORMERLY INCARCERATED VOTER HAS
REGISTERED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED TO THE PUBLIC.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –